North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 16A. Money Transmitters Act. [Repealed]

§§ 53-208.1 through 53-208.30.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-81, s. 2, as amended by Session Laws 2017-102, s. 46, effective October 1, 2016.

History.

G.S. 53-208.1; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.2; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.3; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.4; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.5; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.6; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.7; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.8; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.9; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.10; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.11; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.12; 2001-443, s. 2; 2004-171, s. 6. G.S. 53-208.13; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.14; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.15; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.16; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.17; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.18; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.19; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.20; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.21; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.22; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.22A; 2005-104, s. 1. G.S. 53-208.23; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.24; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.25; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.26; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.27; 2001-443, s. 2; 2009-57, s. 3; 2012-56, s. 14. G.S. 53-208.28; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.29; 2001-443, s. 2. G.S. 53-208.30; 2001-443, s. 2; repealed by 2016-81, s. 2, as amended by Session Laws 2017-102, s. 46, effective October 1, 2016.

§§ 53-208.31 through 53-208.40.

Reserved for future codification purposes.